Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 7
ALZHEIMER'S DISEASE CENTER

23-21-701. Legislative declaration.

To foster the health, welfare, and safety of the people of this state and to facilitate the research and treatment of dementia diseases and related disabilities, it is declared to be the policy of this state to achieve the maximum practical degree of care and treatment for persons suffering from dementia diseases and related disabilities.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (SB 14-211), ch. 341, p. 1516, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1091), ch. 74, p. 648, § 16, effective August 8.

23-21-702. Definitions.

As used in this part 7, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Dementia diseases and related disabilities" has the same meaning set forth in section 25-1-502 (2.5).

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (SB 14-211), ch. 341, p. 1516, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (HB 18-1091), ch. 74, p. 648, § 17, effective August 8.

23-21-703. Center created.

There is established the dementia diseases and related disabilities treatment and research center within the university of Colorado school of medicine. The treatment center must use existing facilities and staff of the university of Colorado school of medicine and may establish programs for the care and treatment of persons suffering from dementia diseases and related disabilities as programs are needed. The treatment center may assist on a continuing basis those persons who require continuing treatment for dementia diseases and related disabilities but who are unable to pay for the entire cost of the services despite the existence of various types of hospital and medical insurance, medicare, medicaid, and other government assistance programs, and private charitable assistance.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (SB 14-211), ch. 341, p. 1516, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1091), ch. 74, p. 648, § 18, effective August 8.

23-21-704. Duties of the school of medicine.

The school of medicine shall:

Develop standards for determining eligibility for care and treatment under this part 7;

Assist in the development and expansion of programs for the care and treatment of persons suffering from dementia diseases and related disabilities, including home care and medical procedures designed to provide maximum control over the diseases and disabilities;

Extend financial assistance to persons suffering from dementia diseases and related disabilities to obtain efficacious agents of control for use in hospital and medical facilities and in the home;

Institute and carry on educational programs for the detection of dementia diseases and related disabilities in the community and for the counseling of individuals and families;

Conduct educational programs for physicians, hospitals, county and district public health agencies, and the public concerning the methods of care and treatment for persons suffering from dementia diseases and related disabilities; and

Establish research programs to promote scientific inquiry into the causes and the possible cure or alleviation of the suffering of persons with dementia diseases and related disabilities.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire part added, (SB 14-211), ch. 341, p. 1517, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 2018:

(1)(b) to (1)(f) amended, (HB 18-1091), ch. 74, p. 648, § 19, effective August 8.